Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1522
Violation; penalty.

Any person that commits any of the acts prohibited by section 59-1520, either knowing or having reason to know he or she is doing so, is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 2001, LB 358, § 4.